Maryland, session 2025, SB0739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
2–204.
(a) A police officer without a warrant may arrest a person if:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0739*

SENATE BILL 739
(1) the police officer has probable cause to believe that:
(i) the person battered:
1. the person’s spouse [or];
2. another person with whom the person resides; OR
3. ANOTHER PERSON WITH WHOM THE PERSON HAS HAD
A SEXUAL RELATIONSHIP WITHIN THE PAST YEAR;
(ii) there is evidence of physical injury; and
(iii) unless the person is arrested immediately, the person:
1. may not be apprehended;
2. may cause physical injury or property damage to another;
or
3. may tamper with, dispose of, or destroy evidence; and
(2) a report to the police was made within 48 hours of the alleged incident.
Article – Family Law
4–513.
In this Part III of this subtitle, “victim of domestic violence” means an individual
who has received deliberate, severe, and demonstrable physical injury, or is in fear of
imminent deliberate, severe, and demonstrable physical injury from:
(1) a current or former spouse[, or];
(2) a current or former cohabitant, as defined in § 4–501 of this subtitle;
OR
(3) ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL WITH WHOM THE INDIVIDUAL HAS HAD A
SEXUAL RELATIONSHIP WITHIN THE PAST YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.